Idaho statutes. Title 74 TRANSPARENT AND ETHICAL GOVERNMENT
Chapter 1 PUBLIC RECORDS ACT
§ 74-113. Access to records about a person by a person.

A person may inspect and copy the records of a public agency or independent public body corporate and politic pertaining to that person, even if the record is otherwise exempt from public disclosure.

A person may request in writing an amendment of any record pertaining to that person. Within ten (10) days of the receipt of the request, the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic shall either:

Make any correction of any portion of the record which the person establishes is not accurate, relevant, or complete; or

Inform the person in writing of the refusal to amend in accordance with the request and the reasons for the refusal, and indicate clearly the person’s right to appeal the refusal and the time period for doing so. The procedures for appealing a refusal to amend shall be the same as those set forth in sections 74-115 and 74-116, Idaho Code, and the court may award reasonable costs and attorney’s fees to the prevailing party or parties, if it finds that the request for amendment or refusal to amend was frivolously pursued.

The right to inspect and amend records pertaining to oneself does not include the right to review:

Otherwise exempt investigatory records of a public agency or independent public body corporate and politic if the investigation is ongoing;

Information that is compiled in reasonable anticipation of a civil action or proceeding which is not otherwise discoverable;

The information relates to adoption records;

Information which is otherwise exempt from disclosure by statute or court rule;

Records of a prisoner maintained by the state or local agency having custody of the prisoner or formerly having custody of the prisoner or by the commission of pardons and parole.

§ 74-114. Access to air quality, water quality and hazardous waste records — Protection of trade secrets.

To the extent required by the federal clean air act, the federal clean water act and the resource conservation and recovery act for state primacy over any delegated or authorized programs, even if the record is otherwise exempt from disclosure under this chapter, any person may inspect and copy:

Air pollution emission data;

The content of any title V operating permit;

The name and address of any Idaho pollutant discharge elimination system (IPDES) applicant or permittee;

The content of any IPDES permit;

IPDES permit applications, and information required to be submitted by IPDES application forms, whether the information is submitted on the application forms themselves or in any attachments used to supply information required by the application forms;

Effluent data or a standard or limitation, as defined in 40 CFR 2.302;

The name and address of any applicant or permittee for a hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility permit pursuant to chapter 44, title 39, Idaho Code; and

Any other record required to be provided to or obtained by the department of environmental quality pursuant to the federal clean air act, the federal clean water act and the resource conservation and recovery act, and the implementing state statutes, federal regulations and state rules, unless the record is a trade secret.

For purposes of this section, a record, or a portion of the record, is a “trade secret” if the information contained in the record is a trade secret within the meaning of the Idaho trade secrets act, sections 48-801, et seq., Idaho Code, including commercial or financial information which, if disclosed, could cause substantial competitive harm to the person from whom the record was obtained.

Any record, or portion of a record, provided to or obtained by the department of environmental quality and identified by the person providing the record as a trade secret shall not be disclosed to the public and shall be kept confidential according to the procedures established in this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the disclosure of a trade secret by the department of environmental quality:

To any officer, employee, or authorized representative of the state or the United States, under a continuing claim of confidentiality, as necessary to carry out the provisions of state or federal law, or when relevant to any proceeding thereunder;

As determined necessary by the director of the department of environmental quality (under a continuing confidentiality claim) to protect the public health and safety from imminent and substantial endangerment;

As required by state or federal law, including section 74-115(3), Idaho Code, under a continuing claim of confidentiality and subsection (1) of this section; or

With the consent of the person from whom the record is obtained.

It shall be the responsibility of any person providing a record to the department of environmental quality to give notice of the existence of a trade secret on each page or other portion of information at the time of submittal, and such person shall have the burden of demonstrating that the information is a trade secret.

Notwithstanding the time frames set forth in section 74-103(1), Idaho Code, when a request is made to the department of environmental quality pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for the disclosure of information for which a trade secret claim has been made, and the information has not been demonstrated to be a trade secret to the satisfaction of the director of the department of environmental quality, within three (3) working days of receipt of the request for the disclosure of the information, the department of environmental quality shall provide a written request for substantiation to the person making the confidentiality claim. A response shall be submitted to the department of environmental quality by the person claiming the trade secret protection within ten (10) working days after receipt of the request for substantiation, or the information subject to the claim shall be disclosed without further notice. Upon receipt of a timely response to the request for substantiation, the director of the department of environmental quality shall determine whether the information is a trade secret subject to protection.

If it is determined that the information, or any portion of the information, is a trade secret, within three (3) working days after receipt of the response, the director of the department of environmental quality shall notify the person requesting the information that the request is denied pursuant to subsections (3) and (4) of section 74-103, Idaho Code.

If it is determined that the information, or any portion of the information, is not a trade secret and is, therefore, subject to disclosure, within three (3) working days after receipt of the response, the director of the department of environmental quality shall inform the person making the confidentiality claim of the determination. The decision shall be a final agency action directly appealable, de novo, to the district court of the county where the records or some part thereof are located. An appeal contesting the decision of the director of the department of environmental quality to release information claimed to be a trade secret shall be filed within ten (10) working days from the date of receipt of the written notice of decision. The information claimed to be a trade secret shall not be disclosed until the period for appeal has expired with no appeal being taken, or a court order has been issued finding that the information is not a trade secret and all appeals of that order have been exhausted.

In any appeal taken pursuant to this section, the court may award reasonable costs and attorney’s fees to the prevailing party if it finds the claim of confidentiality or the decision of the director of the department of environmental quality to provide records was frivolously pursued.

The department of environmental quality shall adopt rules which include:

Appropriate measures to safeguard and protect against improper disclosure of trade secrets, including procedures to train all employees on the proper handling of trade secrets; and

Any other provisions necessary to carry out this section.

As it relates to the department of environmental quality, or to agents, contractors, or other representatives of the department, the immunity created in section 74-118, Idaho Code, shall apply only when disclosure of a trade secret is made consistent with this section.

§ 74-115. Proceedings to enforce right to examine or to receive a copy of records — Retention of disputed records.

The sole remedy for a person aggrieved by the denial of a request for disclosure is to institute proceedings in the district court of the county where the records or some part thereof are located, to compel the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic to make the information available for public inspection in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The petition contesting the public agency’s or independent public body corporate and politic’s decision shall be filed within one hundred eighty (180) calendar days from the date of mailing of the notice of denial or partial denial by the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic. In cases in which the records requested are claimed as exempt pursuant to section 74-107(1) or (24), Idaho Code, the petitioner shall be required to name as a party and serve the person or entity that filed or provided such documents to the agency, and such person or entity shall have standing to oppose the request for disclosure and to support the decision of the agency to deny the request. The time for responsive pleadings and for hearings in such proceedings shall be set by the court at the earliest possible time, or in no event beyond twenty-eight (28) calendar days from the date of filing.

The public agency or independent public body corporate and politic shall keep all documents or records in question until the end of the appeal period, until a decision has been rendered on the petition, or as otherwise statutorily provided, whichever is longer.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall limit the availability of documents and records for discovery in the normal course of judicial or administrative adjudicatory proceedings, subject to the law and rules of evidence and of discovery governing such proceedings. Additionally, in any criminal appeal or post-conviction civil action, this chapter shall not make available the contents of prosecution case files where such material has previously been provided to the defendant nor shall this chapter be available to supplement, augment, substitute or supplant discovery procedures in any other federal, civil or administrative proceeding.

§ 74-116. Order of the court — Court costs and attorney fees.

Whenever it appears that certain public records are being improperly withheld from a member of the public, the court shall order the public official charged with withholding the records to disclose the public record or show cause why he should not do so. The court shall decide the case after examining the pleadings filed by the parties and such oral arguments and additional evidence as the court may allow. The court may examine the record in camera in its discretion.

If the court finds that the public official’s decision to refuse disclosure is not justified, it shall order the public official to make the requested disclosure. If the court determines that the public official was justified in refusing to make the requested record available, he shall return the item to the public official without disclosing its content and shall enter an order supporting the decision refusing disclosure. In any such action, the court shall award reasonable costs and attorney fees to the prevailing party or parties, if it finds that the request or refusal to provide records was frivolously pursued.

§ 74-117. Additional penalty.

If the court finds that a public official has deliberately and in bad faith improperly refused a legitimate request for inspection or copying, a civil penalty shall be assessed against the public official in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), which shall be paid into the general account [fund].

§ 74-118. Immunity.

No public agency or independent public body corporate and politic, public official, or custodian shall be liable, nor shall a cause of action exist, for any loss or damage based upon the release of a public record governed by the provisions of this chapter if the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic, public official or custodian acted in good faith in attempting to comply with the provisions of this chapter.

§ 74-119. Agency guidelines.

By January 1, 2019, every state agency or independent public body corporate and politic shall adopt guidelines that identify the general subject matter of all public records kept or maintained by the state agency or independent public body corporate and politic, the custodian or custodians, and the physical location of such documents. Public agencies shall designate at least one (1) person as custodian to receive public records requests and shall provide an alternate custodian or alternate custodians for contingencies.

§ 74-120. Prohibition on distribution or sale of mailing or telephone number lists — Penalty.

Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8) and (9) of this section, in order to protect the privacy of those who deal with public agencies or an independent public body corporate and politic:

No agency or independent public body corporate and politic may distribute or sell for use as a mailing list or a telephone number list any list of persons without first securing the permission of those on the list; and

No list of persons prepared by the agency or independent public body corporate and politic may be used as a mailing list or a telephone number list except by the agency or independent public body corporate and politic or another agency without first securing the permission of those on the list.

Except as may be otherwise provided in this chapter, this section does not prevent an individual from compiling a mailing list or a telephone number list by examination or copying of public records, original documents or applications which are otherwise open to public inspection.

The provisions of this section do not apply to the lists of registered electors compiled pursuant to title 34, Idaho Code, or to lists of the names of employees governed by chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to agencies which issue occupational or professional licenses.

This section does not apply to the right of access either by Idaho law enforcement agencies or, by purchase or otherwise, of public records dealing with motor vehicle registration.

This section does not apply to a corporate information list developed by the office of the secretary of state containing the name, address, registered agent, officers and directors of corporations authorized to do business in this state or to a business information list developed by the department of commerce containing the name, address, telephone number or other relevant information of Idaho businesses or individuals requesting information regarding the state of Idaho or to business lists developed by the department of agriculture, division of marketing and development [market development division], used to promote food and agricultural products produced in Idaho.

This section does not apply to lists to be used for ordinary utility purposes which are requested by a person who supplies utility services in this state. Ordinary utility purposes, as used in this chapter only, do not include marketing or marketing research.

This section does not apply to lists to be used to give notice required by any statute, ordinance, rule, law or by any governing agency.

This section does not apply to student directory information provided by colleges, universities, secondary schools and school districts to military recruiters for military recruiting purposes pursuant to the requirements of federal laws.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the release of information to the state controller as the state social security administrator as provided in section 59-1101A, Idaho Code.

§ 74-121. Replevin — Public records — Improper or unlawful transfer or removal.

Public records of the state and/or territory of Idaho are the property of the citizens of the state in perpetuity and they may not be improperly or unlawfully transferred or removed from their proper custodian. For purposes of this section, the terms “public record” and “record,” or plurals thereof, shall have the same meaning as “public record” as provided in section 74-101, Idaho Code.

For the purpose of this section, where public records of a county, local district, or independent public body corporate and politic thereof are involved, all references to the state archivist also refer to any responsible public official or records custodian and all references to the attorney general also refer to county prosecutors.

Whenever the state archivist or their designee has reasonable grounds to believe that records belonging to the state, county, local district, or independent public body corporate and politic thereof, are in the possession of a person or entity not authorized by law to possess those records, and such possession was acquired on or after July 1, 2011, he or she may issue a written notice demanding that person or entity to do either of the following within ten (10) calendar days of receiving the notice:

Return the records to the office of origin or the Idaho state archives; or

Respond in writing and declare why the records do not belong to the state or a local agency.

The notice and demand shall identify the records claimed to belong to the state or local agency with reasonable specificity, and shall specify that the state archivist may undertake legal action to recover the records if the person or entity fails to respond in writing within the required time or does not adequately demonstrate that the records do not belong to the state or a local agency.

If a person or entity that receives a written notice and demand from the state archivist pursuant to this chapter fails to deliver the described records, fails to respond to the notice and demand within the required time, or does not adequately demonstrate that the records do not belong to the state or a local agency, the state archivist may ask the attorney general to petition a court of competent jurisdiction for an order requiring the return of the records.

The court may issue any order necessary to protect the records from destruction, alteration, transfer, conveyance or alienation by the person or entity in possession of the records, and may order that the records be surrendered into the custody of the state archivist pending the court’s decision on the petition.

After a hearing, and upon a finding that the specified records are in the possession of a person or entity not authorized by law to possess the records, the court shall order the records to be delivered to the state archivist or other official designated by the court.

If the attorney general recovers a record under this section, the court may award attorney’s fees and court costs.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any public record that is in the custody of an organization or institution shall not be subject to the provisions of this section provided:
(a) That professional standards recognized by the society of American archivists for the management and preservation of historical records are maintained; and

When a record is returned pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section, upon the request of the person, organization or institution that returned the record, the record custodian that receives the record shall issue to that person, organization or institution a copy or digital image of the record which shall be certified as a true copy of the record that was returned to the state or local agency, and dated on the same day the record was returned.

(b) Such records are accessible to the public in a manner consistent with this chapter.

§ 74-122. Confidentiality language required in this chapter.

On and after January 1, 2016, any statute which is added to the Idaho Code and provides for the confidentiality or closure of any public record or class of public records shall be placed in this chapter. Any statute which is added to the Idaho Code on and after January 1, 2016, and which provides for confidentiality or closure of a public record or class of public records and is located at a place other than this chapter shall be null, void and of no force and effect regarding the confidentiality or closure of the public record and such public record shall be open and available to the public for inspection as provided in this chapter.

§ 74-123. Idaho Code is property of the state of Idaho.

The Idaho Code is the property of the state of Idaho, and the state of Idaho and the taxpayers shall be deemed to have a copyright on the Idaho Code. If a person reproduces or distributes the Idaho Code for the purpose of direct or indirect commercial advantage, the person shall owe to the Idaho code commission, as the agent of the state of Idaho, a royalty fee in addition to the fee charged for copying the Idaho Code. Any person who reproduces or distributes the Idaho Code in violation of the provisions of this section, shall be deemed to be an infringer of the state of Idaho’s copyright. The Idaho code commission, through the office of the attorney general, is entitled to institute an action for any infringement of that particular right committed while the Idaho code commission or its designated agent has custody of the Idaho Code.

A court having jurisdiction of a civil action arising under this section may grant such relief as it deems appropriate. At any time while an action under this section is pending, the court may order the impounding, on such terms as it deems reasonable, of all copies claimed to have been made or used in violation of the Idaho code commission’s copyright pursuant to this section.

An infringer of the state of Idaho’s copyright pursuant to this section is liable for any profits the infringer has incurred by obtaining the Idaho Code for commercial purposes or is liable for statutory damages as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

The Idaho code commission, as agent of the copyright owner, may elect, at any time before final judgment is rendered, to recover, instead of actual damages and profits, an award of statutory damages for all infringements involved in the action, with respect to the Idaho Code for which any one (1) infringer is liable individually, or for which any two (2) or more infringers are liable jointly and severally, in a sum of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), as the court considers just.

In any civil action under this section, the court may allow the recovery of full costs by or against any party and may also award reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party as part of the costs.

The Idaho code commission is hereby authorized to license and charge fees for the use of the Idaho Code. The Idaho code commission may grant a license for the use of the Idaho Code to a public agency in the state and waive all or a portion of the fees. All fees recovered by the Idaho code commission shall be deposited in the general account [fund].

§ 74-124. Exemptions from disclosure — Confidentiality.

Notwithstanding any statute or rule of court to the contrary, nothing in this chapter nor chapter 10, title 59, Idaho Code, shall be construed to require disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes by a law enforcement agency, but such exemption from disclosure applies only to the extent that the production of such records would:

Interfere with enforcement proceedings;

Deprive a person of a right to a fair trial or an impartial adjudication;

Constitute an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;

Disclose the identity of a confidential source and, in the case of a record compiled by a criminal law enforcement agency in the course of a criminal investigation, confidential information furnished only by the confidential source;

Disclose investigative techniques and procedures;

Endanger the life or physical safety of law enforcement personnel; or

Disclose the identity of a reporting party maintained by any law enforcement entity or the department of health and welfare relating to the investigation of child abuse, neglect or abandonment unless the reporting party consents in writing to the disclosure or the disclosure of the reporting party’s identity is required in any administrative or judicial proceeding.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, any person involved in a motor vehicle collision which is investigated by a law enforcement agency, that person’s authorized legal representative and the insurer shall have a right to a complete, unaltered copy of the impact report, or its successors, and the final report prepared by the agency.

An inactive investigatory record shall be disclosed unless the disclosure would violate the provisions of subsection (1)(a) through (g) of this section. Investigatory record as used herein means information with respect to an identifiable person or group of persons compiled by a law enforcement agency in the course of conducting an investigation of a specific act or omission and shall not include the following information:

The time, date, location, and nature and description of a reported crime, accident or incident;

The name, sex, age, and address of a person arrested, except as otherwise provided by law;

The time, date, and location of the incident and of the arrest;

The crime charged;

Documents given or required by law to be given to the person arrested;

Informations and indictments except as otherwise provided by law; and

Criminal history reports.

Whenever it is made to appear by verified petition to the district court of the county where the records or some part thereof are situated that certain investigative records are being improperly withheld from a member of the public, the court shall order the officer or person charged with withholding the records to disclose the investigative record or show cause why he should not do so. The court shall decide the case after examining the record in camera, papers filed by the parties, and such oral argument and additional evidence as the court may allow.
If the court finds that the public official’s decision to refuse disclosure is not justified, he shall order the public official to make the record public. If the judge determines that the public official was justified in refusing to make the record public, he shall return the item to the public official without disclosing its content with an order supporting the decision refusing disclosure. Any person who fails to obey the order of the court shall be cited to show cause why he is not in contempt of court. The court may, in its discretion, award costs and fees to the prevailing party.

As used herein, the term “law enforcement agency” means the office of the attorney general, the office of the state controller, the Idaho state police, the office of any prosecuting attorney, sheriff or municipal police department.

§ 74-125. Evidence from preliminary hearing — Admission — Requirements.

Prior to admitting into evidence recorded testimony from a preliminary hearing, the court must find that the testimony offered is:

Offered as evidence of a material fact and that the testimony is more probative on the point for which it is offered than any other evidence which the proponent can procure through reasonable efforts; and

That the witness is, after diligent and good faith attempts to locate, unavailable for the hearing; and

That at the preliminary hearing, the party against whom the admission of the testimony is sought had an adequate opportunity to prepare and cross-examine the proffered testimony.

§ 74-126. Severability.

The provisions of this act are hereby declared to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of remaining portions of this act.